Washington statutes.
RCW 2.50.040

Declaration of necessity by board of county commissioners.

The board of county commissioners (hereinafter called the county board) is empowered to find by resolution the existence of a necessity in such county for organized legal aid. Such resolution shall specify the amount of county funds thereby to be allocated for and expended in the operation of a legal aid bureau during the period of the fiscal year or the remainder thereof. Within ten days after the passage of such a resolution, the commissioners shall cause a certified copy to be transmitted to the board of governors of the Washington State Bar Association (hereinafter called the bar board).

[ 1939 c 93 s 4; RRS s 10007-204. Formerly RCW 74.36.040.]